Maryland, session 2026, HB0219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(b–3) “Administrative policy affecting voting rights” means any action relating to
voter registration, provisional voting, absentee voting, [or] the location of a polling place or
early voting center, OR ASSISTANCE AVAILABLE TO VOTERS, INCLUDING:
(1) LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE;
(2) ASSISTANCE FOR VOTERS WITH DISABILITIES; AND
(3) OTHER ASSISTANCE AS MAY BE REQUIRED BY A VOTER.
1–305.
(a) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
State Board [or], a local board, OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT ADMINISTERS
ITS OWN ELECTIONS may not consider a change in an administrative policy affecting
voting rights at a meeting unless the board [has posted a prominent] OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION PROVIDES REASONABLE public notice [on its website at least 48 hours in
advance of the meeting stating that the board will consider an administrative policy
affecting voting rights at the meeting] OF THE CHANGE UNDER CONSIDERATION AT
LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE MEETING.
(2) DURING THE PERIOD BEGINNING 21 DAYS BEFORE THE FIRST DAY
OF EARLY VOTING THROUGH ELECTION DAY, THE STATE BOARD, A LOCAL BOARD,
OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT ADMINISTERS ITS OWN ELECTIONS MAY
CONSIDER A CHANGE IN ADMINISTRATIVE POLICY AFFECTING VOTING RIGHTS AT A
MEETING IF THE STATE BOARD, LOCAL BOARD, OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
PROVIDES REASONABLE PUBLIC NOTICE OF THE CHANGE AT LEAST 48 HOURS
BEFORE THE SCHEDULED MEETING TIME.
(b) If the State Board [or], a local board, OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT

HOUSE BILL 219 3
ADMINISTERS ITS OWN ELECTIONS adopts a change in an administrative policy affecting
voting rights, the State Board and, if applicable, the local board OR THE MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION that adopted the change shall provide reasonable public notice of the
change as provided in subsection (c) of this section WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER THE
ADOPTION OF THE CHANGE.
(c) The public notice OF A CHANGE OR CONSIDERATION OF A CHANGE IN AN
ADMINISTRATIVE POLICY AFFECTING VOTING RIGHTS UNDER THIS SECTION shall:
(1) be in a reasonably convenient and accessible format;
(2) be prominently posted on the website of the:
(i) State Board; and
(ii) IF APPLICABLE, local board OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
that adopted OR CONSIDERED the change[, if applicable]; AND
(3) include a concise description of the change, including the difference
between the [new] CHANGE IN administrative policy affecting voting rights and the
administrative policy affecting voting rights that was previously in effect[; and
(4) be provided within 48 hours of the adoption of the change] WITHOUT
THE CHANGE.
(D) (1) THE STATE BOARD SHALL MAINTAIN A PAGE ON ITS WEBSITE
THAT CONTAINS ANY NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) IMMEDIATELY AFTER PROVIDING NOTICE UNDER THIS
SECTION, A LOCAL BOARD OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF
THE NOTICE TO THE STATE BOARD FOR INCLUSION ON THE STATE BOARD’S
WEBSITE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE STATE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH A NOTICE RECEIVED
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, BUT NOT LATER THAN 5 DAYS
AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE NOTICE IS RECEIVED.
TITLE 15.3. VOTING RIGHTS ACT – VOTER INTIMIDATION AND SUPPRESSION.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS.
15.3–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS

HOUSE BILL 219
INDICATED UNLESS A DIFFERENT MEANING IS CLEARLY INTENDED FROM THE
CONTEXT.
(B) “ATTORNEY GENERAL” MEANS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(C) “COURT” MEANS THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(D) “DISPARITY” MEANS VARIANCE THAT IS SUPPORTED BY VALIDATED
METHODOLOGIES AND, WHERE RELEVANT, IS STATISTICALLY SIGNIFICANT.
(E) “ELECTION POLICY OR PRACTICE” MEANS:
(1) A VOTING QUALIFICATION OR PREREQUISITE TO VOTING; OR
(2) A LAW, AN ORDINANCE, A RESOLUTION, A CHARTER OR CODE
PROVISION, A REGULATION, A RULE, A POLICY, A PRACTICE, A PROCEDURE, A
STANDARD, OR AN ACTION WITH RESPECT TO VOTING OR THE ADMINISTRATION OF
ELECTIONS.
(F) “GOVERNING BODY” MEANS:
(1) FOR BALTIMORE CITY, THE CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY;
(2) FOR A CHARTER COUNTY, THE COUNTY COUNCIL;
(3) FOR A CODE HOME RULE COUNTY, THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS;
(4) FOR A COMMISSION COUNTY, THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS;
(5) FOR A MUNICIPALITY, THE REPRESENTATIVE BODY PROVIDED
UNDER THE MUNICIPAL CHARTER; AND
(6) FOR A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION, THE ELECTED VOTING
MEMBERS OF THE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(G) “LOCAL GOVERNMENT” MEANS:
(1) A MUNICIPALITY OR COUNTY, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN §
1–101 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
(2) A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 219 5
(H) “PROTECTED CLASS” MEANS A CLASS OF CITIZENS WHO ARE MEMBERS
OF A RACE, COLOR, OR LANGUAGE MINORITY GROUP, INCLUDING A CLASS
COMPOSED OF MEMBERS OF TWO OR MORE MINORITY GROUPS.
(I) “VOTE” INCLUDES ANY ACTION NECESSARY TO CAST A BALLOT AND
MAKE THAT BALLOT COUNT IN AN ELECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) REGISTERING TO VOTE;
(2) REQUESTING A MAIL–IN BALLOT; AND
(3) ANY OTHER ACTION REQUIRED BY LAW AS A PREREQUISITE TO
CASTING A BALLOT AND HAVING THAT BALLOT COUNTED, CANVASSED, CERTIFIED,
AND INCLUDED IN THE APPROPRIATE TOTALS OF VOTES CAST IN AN ELECTION.
15.3–102.
STATUTES, RULES AND REGULATIONS, AND LOCAL LAWS, TOWN CHARTERS,
OR ORDINANCES RELATED TO THE RIGHT TO VOTE SHALL BE CONSTRUED
LIBERALLY IN FAVOR OF:
(1) PROTECTING THE RIGHT TO CAST A BALLOT;
(2) ENSURING THAT ELIGIBLE VOTERS ARE NOT IMPAIRED IN
REGISTERING TO VOTE OR VOTING, INCLUDING HAVING THEIR VOTES COUNTED;
AND
(3) ENSURING THAT PROTECTED CLASS VOTERS HAVE EQUITABLE
ACCESS TO OPPORTUNITIES TO REGISTER TO VOTE AND TO VOTE.
15.3–103.
TO THE EXTENT THAT THE COURT IS AFFORDED DISCRETION IN ANY
QUESTION, INCLUDING QUESTIONS RELATED TO DISCOVERY, PROCEDURE,
ADMISSIBILITY OF EVIDENCE, AND REMEDIES, THE COURT SHALL EXERCISE THE
DISCRETION IN FAVOR OF:
(1) PROTECTING THE RIGHT TO CAST A BALLOT;
(2) ENSURING THAT ELIGIBLE VOTERS ARE NOT IMPAIRED IN
REGISTERING TO VOTE OR VOTING, INCLUDING HAVING VOTES OF ELIGIBLE VOTERS
COUNTED; AND

HOUSE BILL 219
(3) ENSURING THAT PROTECTED CLASS VOTERS HAVE EQUITABLE
ACCESS TO OPPORTUNITIES TO REGISTER TO VOTE AND TO VOTE.
15.3–104.
IF ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE OR ITS APPLICATION TO ANY PERSON OR
CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD TO BE INVALID BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION,
THE INVALIDITY DOES NOT AFFECT OTHER PROVISIONS OR APPLICATIONS OF THIS
TITLE THAT CAN BE GIVEN EFFECT WITHOUT THE INVALID PROVISION OR
APPLICATION AND, TO THIS END, THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE ARE SEVERABLE.
SUBTITLE 2. PROHIBITION ON VOTER INTIMIDATION.
15.3–201.
A PERSON, WHETHER ACTING UNDER COLOR OF LAW OR OTHERWISE, MAY NOT
ENGAGE IN ACTS OF INTIMIDATION, DECEPTION, OR OBSTRUCTION THAT
INTERFERE WITH AN INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO VOTE.
15.3–202.
THE FOLLOWING SHALL CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF § 15.3–201 OF THIS
SUBTITLE:
(1) THE USE OF FORCE OR THREATS TO USE FORCE, OR THE USE OF
ANY OTHER CONDUCT TO PRACTICE INTIMIDATION THAT CAUSES OR WILL
REASONABLY HAVE THE EFFECT OF CAUSING INTERFERENCE WITH AN
INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO VOTE;
(2) THE KNOWING USE OF A DECEPTIVE OR FRAUDULENT DEVICE,
CONTRIVANCE, OR COMMUNICATION THAT CAUSES OR WILL REASONABLY HAVE THE
EFFECT OF CAUSING INTERFERENCE WITH ANY INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO VOTE; OR
(3) THE OBSTRUCTION OF, IMPEDIMENT TO, OR OTHER
INTERFERENCE WITH:
(I) ACCESS TO A POLLING PLACE, A BALLOT DROP BOX, OR AN
OFFICE OR A PLACE OF BUSINESS OF AN ELECTION OFFICIAL; OR
(II) A VOTER IN A MANNER THAT CAUSES OR WILL REASONABLY
HAVE THE EFFECT OF CAUSING ANY DELAY IN VOTING OR THE VOTING PROCESS.

HOUSE BILL 219 7
15.3–203.
A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE OR WHO AIDS IN THE VIOLATION OF
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES AWARDED BY THE COURT,
INCLUDING NOMINAL DAMAGES FOR ANY VIOLATION AND COMPENSATORY OR
PUNITIVE DAMAGES FOR ANY WILLFUL VIOLATION.
SUBTITLE 3. PROHIBITION ON VOTER SUPPRESSION.
15.3–301.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT
OR GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY RESPONSIBLE FOR ELECTION ADMINISTRATION MAY
NOT IMPLEMENT, IMPOSE, OR ENFORCE AN ELECTION POLICY OR PRACTICE, OR
TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION OR FAIL TO TAKE ANY ACTION, THAT RESULTS IN, IS
LIKELY TO RESULT IN, OR IS INTENDED TO RESULT IN A MATERIAL DISPARITY IN
VOTER PARTICIPATION, ACCESS TO VOTING OPPORTUNITIES, OR THE OPPORTUNITY
OR ABILITY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE POLITICAL PROCESS BETWEEN MEMBERS OF A
PROTECTED CLASS AND OTHER MEMBERS OF THE ELECTORATE.
(B) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY RESPONSIBLE FOR
ELECTION ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT BE DETERMINED TO HAVE VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY DEMONSTRATES BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT:
(1) THE ELECTION POLICY OR PRACTICE IS NECESSARY TO
SIGNIFICANTLY FURTHER A COMPELLING INTEREST; AND
(2) THERE IS NO ALTERNATIVE THAT RESULTS IN A SMALLER
DISPARITY BETWEEN MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS AND OTHER MEMBERS OF
THE ELECTORATE.
(C) IN DETERMINING WHETHER A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE HAS
OCCURRED WITH RESPECT TO A PROTECTED CLASS, THE COURT SHALL, SUBJECT
TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, CONSIDER WHETHER PROTECTED CLASS
MEMBERS ARE VULNERABLE TO OR OTHERWISE AT RISK OF VOTING
DISCRIMINATION, INCLUDING BY EVALUATING:
(1) THE HISTORY AND EFFECTS OF DISCRIMINATION AGAINST
PROTECTED CLASS MEMBERS; AND
(2) THE EXTENT TO WHICH PROTECTED CLASS MEMBERS ENCOUNTER
BARRIERS, DISPARITIES, OR HOSTILITY WITH RESPECT TO POLITICAL

HOUSE BILL 219
PARTICIPATION AND CIVIC LIFE.
(D) (1) IN DETERMINING WHETHER A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE HAS
OCCURRED, THE COURT MAY NOT CONSIDER:
(I) THE NUMBER OF PROTECTED CLASS MEMBERS
UNAFFECTED BY THE ELECTION POLICY OR PRACTICE;
(II) THE DEGREE TO WHICH THE ELECTION POLICY OR
PRACTICE HAS A LONG PEDIGREE OR WAS IN WIDESPREAD USE AT SOME EARLIER
DATE;
(III) THE USE OF AN IDENTICAL OR SIMILAR ELECTION POLICY
OR PRACTICE IN OTHER STATES OR JURISDICTIONS;
(IV) THE AVAILABILITY OF OTHER FORMS OF VOTING
UNIMPACTED BY THE ELECTION POLICY OR PRACTICE, UNLESS THE JURISDICTION
IS SIMULTANEOUSLY EXPANDING THE OTHER PRACTICES TO ELIMINATE ANY
DISPROPORTIONATE BURDEN IMPOSED BY THE ELECTION POLICY OR PRACTICE; OR
(V) UNSUBSTANTIATED DEFENSES THAT THE ELECTION POLICY
OR PRACTICE IS NECESSARY TO ADDRESS CRIMINAL ACTIVITY.
(2) EVIDENCE CONCERNING THE INTENT OF VOTERS, ELECTED
OFFICIALS, OR PUBLIC OFFICIALS TO DISCRIMINATE AGAINST MEMBERS OF A
PROTECTED CLASS IS NOT NECESSARY FOR THE COURT TO FIND A VIOLATION OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
15.3–302.
(A) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS MAY FILE AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IN THE COURT:
(1) AN AGGRIEVED PERSON;
(2) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MEMBERSHIP INCLUDES OR IS LIKELY
TO INCLUDE AGGRIEVED PERSONS;
(3) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MISSION WOULD BE FRUSTRATED BY A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) AN ORGANIZATION THAT WOULD EXPEND RESOURCES IN ORDER
TO FULFILL ITS MISSION AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR

HOUSE BILL 219 9
(5) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, IF THE COURT FINDS A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT SHALL ORDER APPROPRIATE REMEDIES
THAT ARE TAILORED TO ADDRESS THE VIOLATION IN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND
ENSURE THAT PROTECTED CLASS VOTERS HAVE EQUITABLE ACCESS TO FULLY
PARTICIPATE IN THE ELECTORAL PROCESS, WHICH MAY INCLUDE:
(I) PROVIDING ADDITIONAL TIME TO VOTE DURING AN
ELECTION;
(II) ELIMINATION OF STAGGERED ELECTIONS SO THAT ALL
MEMBERS OF THE GOVERNING BODY ARE ELECTED AT THE SAME TIME;
(III) ADDITIONAL VOTING HOURS OR DAYS;
(IV) ADDITIONAL POLLING LOCATIONS;
(V) ADDITIONAL MEANS OF VOTING, SUCH AS VOTING BY MAIL
OR ADDITIONAL OPPORTUNITIES TO RETURN BALLOTS;
(VI) ORDERING OF SPECIAL ELECTIONS;
(VII) REQUIRING EXPANDED OPPORTUNITIES FOR THE
ADMISSION OF VOTERS;
(VIII) REQUIRING ADDITIONAL VOTER EDUCATION;
(IX) THE RESTORATION OR ADDITION OF PERSONS TO THE
STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST;
(X) PREVENTING THE REORGANIZATION, ANNEXATION,
INCORPORATION, DISSOLUTION, CONSOLIDATION, OR DIVISION OF A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT; OR
(XI) RETAINING JURISDICTION FOR A PERIOD OF TIME
DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE COURT.
(2) (I) THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER REMEDIES PROPOSED BY
ANY PARTIES TO AN ACTION OR BY INTERESTED PARTIES FILED UNDER THIS
SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 219
(II) THE COURT MAY NOT GIVE DEFERENCE OR PRIORITY TO A
PROPOSED REMEDY BECAUSE IT IS THE REMEDY PROPOSED BY THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT.
(III) THE COURT SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO REQUIRE A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT TO IMPLEMENT REMEDIES THAT ARE INCONSISTENT WITH ANY
OTHER PROVISION OF STATE OR LOCAL LAW.
15.3–303.
(A) (1) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE AS DESCRIBED IN
THIS SECTION AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE A HEARING TO ADOPT ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING CHANGES:
(I) A CHANGE TO THE METHOD OF ELECTION FOR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT;
(II) A GOVERNMENTAL REORGANIZATION, INCLUDING
ANNEXATION, INCORPORATION, DISSOLUTION, CONSOLIDATION, OR DIVISION OF A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(III) A CHANGE TO DISTRICT BOUNDARIES WITHIN A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT; AND
(IV) A CHARTER AMENDMENT AUTHORIZING AN
ADMINISTRATIVE POLICY AFFECTING VOTING RIGHTS.
(2) IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT ADOPTS A RESOLUTION SPECIFYING
THE DAY AND HOURS FOR A REFERENDUM ON A CHANGE IDENTIFIED IN PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE AS
DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER
STATE LAW.
(3) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, PROVIDE NOTICE
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION BY:
(I) PUBLISHING AND MAKING AVAILABLE THE TEXT OF THE
PROPOSED CHANGE FOR PUBLIC DISSEMINATION, INCLUDING THROUGH PRINT
NOTICES IN AT LEAST ONE PUBLIC BUILDING AND ON THE WEBSITE OF THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT, IF APPLICABLE;
(II) TAKING APPROPRIATE STEPS TO PROVIDE MEANINGFUL
NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED CHANGE TO RESIDENTS WITH DISABILITIES AND

HOUSE BILL 219 11
RESIDENTS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY; AND
(III) SUBMITTING THE TEXT OF THE PROPOSED CHANGE TO THE
STATE BOARD.
(4) THE STATE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH THE NOTICES SUBMITTED TO
THE STATE BOARD UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN THE SAME
MANNER AS THOSE REQUIRED UNDER § 1–305 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, BEFORE
FILING AN ACTION AGAINST A LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, A PARTY
DESCRIBED IN § 15.3–302(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL SEND BY CERTIFIED MAIL,
RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, A NOTIFICATION LETTER TO THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT:
(I) ASSERTING THAT THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY BE IN
VIOLATION OF THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) IDENTIFYING THE POTENTIAL VIOLATIONS;
(III) IDENTIFYING THE AFFECTED PROTECTED CLASS; AND
(IV) IDENTIFYING THE TYPE OF REMEDY THAT THE PARTY
BELIEVES WILL ADDRESS THE ALLEGED VIOLATIONS.
(2) THE PARTY MAY NOT FILE AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
UNTIL 60 DAYS AFTER SENDING A NOTIFICATION LETTER TO THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OR ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN DENIAL BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
WHICHEVER IS EARLIER.
(3) A NOTIFICATION LETTER IS NOT REQUIRED IF:
(I) THE PARTY IS SEEKING PRELIMINARY RELIEF WITH
RESPECT TO AN UPCOMING ELECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15.3–402(B) OF THIS
TITLE;
(II) THE PARTY IS SEEKING TO INTERVENE IN OR JOIN AN
EXISTING ACTION;
(III) ANOTHER PARTY HAS ALREADY SUBMITTED A
NOTIFICATION LETTER ALLEGING A SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR VIOLATION AND THAT
PARTY IS ELIGIBLE TO FILE AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;

HOUSE BILL 219
(IV) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAS ENACTED A CHANGE
IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITHOUT THE REQUIRED
NOTICE AND THE PARTY SEEKS RELIEF FROM THAT CHANGE;
(V) FOLLOWING THE PARTY’S SUBMISSION OF A NOTIFICATION
LETTER, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAS ENACTED A CHANGE IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION THAT WOULD NOT REMEDY THE POTENTIAL
VIOLATION IDENTIFIED IN THE PARTY’S NOTIFICATION LETTER; OR
(VI) THE PROSPECT OF OBTAINING RELIEF WOULD BE FUTILE.
(4) (I) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL RESPOND IN WRITING TO A
NOTIFICATION LETTER SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF THE NOTIFICATION LETTER.
(II) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT DOES NOT DENY THE
POTENTIAL VIOLATION, IT SHALL WORK IN GOOD FAITH WITH THE PARTY THAT
SUBMITTED THE NOTIFICATION LETTER TO IMPLEMENT MUTUALLY AGREEABLE
REMEDIES TO CURE THE POTENTIAL VIOLATION.
(III) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ADOPTS A RESOLUTION
WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTIFICATION LETTER IDENTIFYING A
REMEDY, AFFIRMING ITS INTENT TO ENACT AND IMPLEMENT A REMEDY, AND
ESTABLISHING A TIMELINE AND SPECIFIC STEPS IT WILL TAKE TO DO SO:
1. THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL ENACT AND
IMPLEMENT THE REMEDY WITHIN 150 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE NOTIFICATION
LETTER; AND
2. THE PARTY WHO SUBMITTED THE NOTIFICATION
LETTER UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT FILE AN ACTION AGAINST THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT WITHIN THE 150 DAYS ALLOWED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH.
(5) (I) IF, UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE OR ANY CODE HOME
RULE OR CHARTER COUNTY ORDINANCE, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT LACKS AUTHORITY TO ENACT OR IMPLEMENT A REMEDY IDENTIFIED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (4)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 150 DAYS FROM THE
SUBMISSION OF THE NOTIFICATION LETTER, OR THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IS A
COVERED JURISDICTION UNDER A STATE OR FEDERAL PRECLEARANCE PROGRAM,
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NONETHELESS ENACT AND IMPLEMENT A PROPOSED
REMEDY ON APPROVAL BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH.

HOUSE BILL 219 13
(II) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY AUTHORIZE THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT TO IMPLEMENT OR ENACT A REMEDY NOTWITHSTANDING THE
APPLICABLE LAW OR AUTHORITY TO THE CONTRARY IF:
1. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THAT THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY BE IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
2. THE PROPOSED REMEDY WOULD ADDRESS A
POTENTIAL VIOLATION;
3. THE PROPOSED REMEDY IS UNLIKELY TO VIOLATE
THE U.S. CONSTITUTION OR ANY RELEVANT FEDERAL LAW; AND
4. THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROPOSED REMEDY IS
FEASIBLE.
(III) APPROVAL OF A REMEDY BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS
NOT A BAR TO AN ACTION TO CHALLENGE THE REMEDY.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING REGULATIONS TO:
(1) SPECIFY PROCEDURES AND ADMINISTRATIVE DEADLINES; AND
(2) PROVIDE FOR NOTICE AND COMMENT PROCEDURES THAT LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS ARE REQUIRED TO FOLLOW BEFORE IMPLEMENTING REMEDIES
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
15.3–304.
IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENACTS OR IMPLEMENTS A REMEDY, THE PARTY
THAT SENT A NOTIFICATION LETTER UNDER § 15.3–303(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
BE ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT FOR REASONABLE
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH PRODUCING AND SENDING THE NOTIFICATION LETTER
AND ANY ACCOMPANYING EVIDENCE.
SUBTITLE 4. JURISDICTION AND PROCEEDINGS.
15.3–401.
IN AN ACTION OR INVESTIGATION TO ENFORCE THIS TITLE, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY:

HOUSE BILL 219
(1) ADMINISTER OATHS;
(2) EXAMINE WITNESSES UNDER OATH;
(3) RECEIVE ORAL AND DOCUMENTARY EVIDENCE;
(4) DETERMINE MATERIAL FACTS; AND
(5) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ORDINARY RULES OF CIVIL
PROCEDURE:
(I) ISSUE SUBPOENAS; AND
(II) OTHERWISE COMPEL THE PRODUCTION OF RECORDS,
BOOKS, PAPERS, CONTRACTS, AND OTHER DOCUMENTS.
15.3–402.
(A) ACTIONS BROUGHT UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL BE SUBJECT TO
EXPEDITED PRETRIAL AND TRIAL PROCEEDINGS AND RECEIVE AN AUTOMATIC
CALENDAR PREFERENCE.
(B) IF A PARTY SEEKING PRELIMINARY RELIEF ALLEGES A VIOLATION OF
THIS TITLE THAT RELATES TO AN UPCOMING ELECTION, THE COURT SHALL GRANT
RELIEF IF IT DETERMINES THAT:
(1) THE PARTY IS MORE LIKELY THAN NOT TO SUCCEED ON THE
MERITS; AND
(2) IT IS POSSIBLE TO IMPLEMENT AN APPROPRIATE REMEDY THAT
WOULD RESOLVE THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IN THE UPCOMING ELECTION.
SUBTITLE 5. COSTS AND FEES.
15.3–501.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN AN
ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS TITLE, THE COURT SHALL AWARD REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES AND LITIGATION COSTS, INCLUDING EXPERT WITNESS FEES AND
EXPENSES, TO THE PARTY THAT PREVAILED IN THE ACTION.
(B) (1) IF THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT IS AN OPPOSING PARTY, A

HOUSE BILL 219 15
PARTY WILL BE DEEMED TO HAVE PREVAILED IN AN ACTION WHEN, AS A RESULT OF
THE ACTION, THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT YIELDS SOME OR ALL OF THE
RELIEF SOUGHT IN THE ACTION.
(2) IF THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT PREVAILS IN AN ACTION
UNDER THIS TITLE, THE COURT MAY NOT AWARD THE STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ANY COSTS UNLESS THE COURT FINDS THE ACTION TO BE
FRIVOLOUS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.